phonology/04_gutturals.xfst
!
! 04_gutturals.xfst - Guttural Rules
! Rules for א, ה, ח, ע, ר
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §§26-28, GKC §§33-35
!

!
! ============================================================
! DEFINITIONS
! ============================================================

define Guttural     [ 3 | h | h | r ] .
define GutturalCons [ א | ה | ח | ע | ר ] .
define He         h .
define Aleph       3 .

!
! ============================================================
! Guttural rejects dagesh
! Gutturals cannot take dagesh forte
! → compensatory lengthening or virtual doubling
! ============================================================

define Guttural_No_Dagesh
  d:א -> 0 || GutturalCons _ .
  d:ה -> 0 || GutturalCons _ .
  d:ח -> 0 || GutturalCons _ .
  d:ע -> 0 || GutturalCons _ .
  d:ר -> 0 || GutturalCons _ .

!
! ============================================================
! Guttural preference for a-vowels
! Gutturals prefer patach/qamets over other vowels
! ============================================================

define Guttural_Prefer_A
  [ e | i ] -> a || _ Guttural .
  [ e | i ] -> a || GutturalCons _ .
  
  o -> a || _ Guttural .
  o -> a || GutturalCons _ .

!
! Composite shewa for gutturals
! Gutturals can't take vocal shewa
! → hateph-patach/segol/qamets instead
! ============================================================

define Guttural_Composite_Shewa
  0:ב || GutturalCons _ .     ! hateph-patach
  0:ג || GutturalCons _ .     ! hateph-segol
  0:כ || GutturalCons _ .     ! hateph-qamets

!
! Guttural at end of word
! Final he takes mappiq (consonantal value)
! ============================================================

define He_Final
  0:h || _ # .
  
! ==================================================================
! He with article (הַ) vs locative (ה)
! ==================================================================

define He_Article
  h:a -> h:a || _ # .
  h:0 -> h:0 || i _ # .

!
! ============================================================
! Aleph handling
! Aleph is silent with various realizations
! ============================================================

define Aleph_Vowel
  3 -> 0 || Vowel _ Vowel .
  3 -> ʔ || Consonant _ .
  3 -> 0 || # _ .

!
! ============================================================
! Compose guttural rules
! ============================================================

define GutturalRules
  Guttural_No_Dagesh
  .o.
  Guttural_Prefer_A
  .o.
  Guttural_Composite_Shewa
  .o.
  He_Final
  .o.
  He_Article
  .o.
  Aleph_Vowel
;

regex GutturalRules;
